Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1798
Money-type instruments.

A credit union may collect, receive, and disburse money in connection with the providing of negotiable checks, money orders, traveler's checks, and other money-type instruments, for the providing of services through automatic teller machines, and for such other purposes as may provide benefit or convenience to its members. A credit union may charge fees for such services.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 98.